Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-110 Rejection of application,
joint underwriting plan placement. A producer, including a branch office
of a foreign or alien insurer, upon rejection of an application for a motor
vehicle insurance policy or optional additional insurance, shall immediately
offer, subject to the guidelines established by rules of the commissioner, to
place the requested insurance coverages with the joint underwriting plan. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L Sp 1993, c 4, §2; am L 1997, c 251, §21; am L 2001,
c 216, §18]

Cross References

Joint underwriting plan, see §431:10C-401, et seq.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next